Utah statutes.
53A-15-303.5.   Participation of students with a disability in
extracurricular activities.
(1)  A student with a disability may not be denied the opportunity of
participating in public school programs or extracurricular activities solely
because of the student's age, unless the participation threatens the health or
safety of the student.
(2)  The school district in cooperation with the Utah Department of Health
shall establish criteria used to determine the health and safety factor.
(3)  Subsection (1) applies to a student who:
(a)  has not graduated from high school with a regular diploma; and
(b)  is under the age of 20, if participation is recommended by the student's
individualized education program team.
